Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20173-158
Person renting aircraft; insurance information; notice.

Any person who in the ordinary course of his or her business rents an aircraft to another person shall deliver to the renter a written notice stating the nature and extent of insurance coverage provided, if any, for the renter against loss of or damage to the hull of the aircraft or liability arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of the aircraft. The notice shall contain the name of the person giving the notice and shall be in the form prescribed by rule or regulation which the division shall adopt and promulgate.

Laws 1986, LB 781, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 48.